Maryland, session 2026, HB0572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–307.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MARKET CAPITALIZATION” MEANS THE TOTAL
MARKET VALUE OF A COMPANY’S OUTSTANDING SHARES OF STOCK.
(B) FOR THE PROTECTION OF THE HEALTH AND SAFETY OF THE STATE’S
CITIZENS AND ENVIRONMENT, IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT
A PUBLICLY TRADED ENTITY, INCLUDING ITS SUBSIDIARIES, WITH A CUMULATIVE
MARKET CAPITALIZATION GREATER THAN $1,000,000,000 THAT IS OR WAS
INVOLVED IN EXTRACTING, REFINING, OR PROCESSING COAL, OIL, OR GAS BE HELD
ACCOUNTABLE FOR ANY TORTIOUS OR OTHERWISE UNLAWFUL CONDUCT ON THE
PART OF THE ENTITY OR SUBSIDIARY THAT HAS CONTRIBUTED TO CLIMATE
CHANGE, INCLUDING ASSOCIATED ENVIRONMENTAL AND OTHER HARMS CAUSED,
WHETHER THROUGH FRAUD, DECEPTION, OR ANY OTHER MECHANISM, ACTION,
INACTION, OR PRACTICE.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INVESTIGATE, COMMENCE, AND
PROSECUTE OR DEFEND ANY CIVIL OR CRIMINAL SUIT OR ACTION THAT HOLDS

HOUSE BILL 572 3
ACCOUNTABLE A PUBLICLY TRADED ENTITY, INCLUDING ITS SUBSIDIARIES, WITH A
CUMULATIVE MARKET CAPITALIZATION GREATER THAN $1,000,000,000 AT THE
TIME A SUIT OR AN ACTION IS FILED THAT IS OR WAS INVOLVED IN EXTRACTING,
REFINING, OR PROCESSING COAL, OIL, OR GAS FOR ANY TORTIOUS OR OTHERWISE
UNLAWFUL CONDUCT ON THE PART OF THE ENTITY OR SUBSIDIARY THAT HAS
CONTRIBUTED TO CLIMATE CHANGE THROUGH FRAUD, DECEPTION, OR ANY OTHER
MECHANISM, ACTION, INACTION, OR PRACTICE.
(D) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY HIRE OUTSIDE COUNSEL TO ASSIST
WITH AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES
THAT HIRING OUTSIDE COUNSEL IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE STATE.
(E) THE PROVISIONS OF § 6–106.2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE
SHALL APPLY TO ANY ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER THIS
SECTION.
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 14. CLIMATE CRIMES ACCOUNTABILITY FUND.
14–1401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “FUND” MEANS THE CLIMATE CRIMES ACCOUNTABILITY FUND.
(C) “SALTWATER INTRUSION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–1001 OF
THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
(D) “VECTORBORNE PATHOGEN” MEANS A GERM OR PARASITE THAT IS
SPREAD TO HUMANS AND OTHER ANIMALS BY A VECTOR, SUCH AS A MOSQUITO,
TICK, OR FLEA.
(E) “WATERBORNE PATHOGEN” MEANS A MICROORGANISM, SUCH AS
BACTERIA, A VIRUS, A PARASITE, OR AN AMOEBA, THAT CAN CAUSE ILLNESS IN
HUMANS AND ANIMALS IF EXPOSED TO WATER CONTAMINATED BY THE
MICROORGANISM.
14–1402.
(A) THERE IS A CLIMATE CRIMES ACCOUNTABILITY FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PAY FOR PROGRAMS THAT PREVENT,

HOUSE BILL 572
MITIGATE, OR REPAIR HARMS CAUSED BY CLIMATE CHANGE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) ALL REVENUES RECEIVED BY THE STATE RESULTING DIRECTLY
OR INDIRECTLY FROM ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST OR SETTLEMENT WITH AN ENTITY
IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER § 1–307 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO:
(1) PAY FOR PROGRAMS THAT PREVENT, MITIGATE, OR REPAIR
HARMS CAUSED BY CLIMATE CHANGE, INCLUDING PROGRAMS ADDRESSING:
(I) AIR POLLUTION;
(II) DANGEROUSLY HIGH TEMPERATURES, SUCH AS URBAN
HEAT ISLANDS OR EXTENDED HEAT WAVES;
(III) DROUGHT;
(IV) ECOSYSTEM CHANGES;
(V) FLOODING;
(VI) SALTWATER INTRUSION;
(VII) STORM DAMAGE;
(VIII) VECTORBORNE PATHOGENS;

HOUSE BILL 572 5
(IX) WATERBORNE PATHOGENS; AND
(X) WILDFIRES;
(2) PAY FOR EXPENSES RELATED TO ANY ACTION BROUGHT BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER § 1–307 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, INCLUDING:
(I) INVESTIGATION EXPENSES;
(II) LITIGATION EXPENSES; AND
(III) TRIAL PREPARATION EXPENSES; AND
(3) PAY ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES RELATED TO THE DISTRIBUTION
OF FUNDS TO PROGRAMS UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR PROGRAMS THAT PREVENT,
MITIGATE, OR REPAIR HARMS CAUSED BY CLIMATE CHANGE IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO
AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD
BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAMS.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.

HOUSE BILL 572
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE CLIMATE CRIMES ACCOUNTABILITY FUND.
Article – State Government
6–106.2.
(a) This section applies to:
(1) an action brought or asserted by the State arising from or related to
alleged or threatened injuries to the environment, infrastructure, or the natural resources
of the State associated with the allision between the vessel known as the Dali and the
Francis Scott Key Bridge on March 26, 2024; AND
(2) ANY ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER §
1–307 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Proportionate share of liability” means the percentage of comparative
responsibility assigned by a judge or jury to a settling party in accordance with this section.
(3) “Responsible person” means a person alleged to be liable in an action
governed by this section.
(c) In an action governed by this section, the judge or jury shall:
(1) make a determination of the total liability, including damages, costs,
and any other available relief;
(2) assign comparative responsibility to each party joined in the action,
including all defendants, third–party defendants, intervenors, and any other named party,
based on the party’s relative degree of fault or responsibility for the total liability; and
(3) if equity requires, determine the liability of a group of related persons
on a collective basis.

HOUSE BILL 572 7
(d) If the State has not obtained complete relief from a responsible person who
has resolved the person’s liability to the State in a settlement of an action governed by this
section, the State may:
(1) continue to pursue an action against any other responsible person who
has not resolved the person’s liability to the State; or
(2) bring a new action against any other responsible person who has not
resolved the person’s liability to the State.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of State law:
(1) the Maryland Uniform Contribution Among Joint Tort–Feasors Act
under Title 3, Subtitle 14 of the Courts Article does not apply to an action governed by this
section;
(2) if a responsible person resolves the person’s liability to the State in a
settlement of an action governed by this section, the person may not be liable for claims for
noncontractual contribution or indemnity regarding any action or claim resolved in the
settlement; and
(3) a settlement of an action governed by this section that resolves the
liability of a responsible person:
(i) does not release from liability any other responsible person
except as specifically provided in the terms of the settlement; but
(ii) reduces the potential liability of all other responsible persons
liable in whole or in part by the larger of:
1. the settling person’s proportionate share of liability; or
2. the amount the settling person pays to settle the action.
(f) This section may not be construed to:
(1) impair any express contractual rights;
(2) create new types of actions or claims;
(3) alter the burden of proof, causation standard, or elements of an action
or claim governed by this section; or
(4) grant authority to the State or the Attorney General to bring actions or
claims not otherwise authorized by law.

HOUSE BILL 572
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.